Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 3. Forest Management of State-Owned Lands Fund.

§ 10.1-1120.
Forest Management of State-Owned Lands Fund.

The Forest Management of State-Owned Lands Fund established by the legislature in 1980 is continued.

History.

1980, c. 525, § 10-45.1; 1988, c. 891.

Cross references.

As to the management, harvesting and sale of timber on lands under control of the Division of Engineering and Buildings, see § 2.2-1158.

§ 10.1-1121.
Definitions.

As used in this article unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Fund”
means the Forest Management of State-Owned Lands Fund.

“State-owned lands”
means forest land owned or managed by the various departments, agencies and institutions of the Commonwealth and designated by the Department in cooperation with the Division of Engineering and Buildings of the Department of General Services as being of sufficient size and value to benefit from a forest management plan. State-owned land shall not include properties held or managed by the Department of Wildlife Resources, the Department of Forestry, or the Department of Conservation and Recreation.

History.

1980, c. 525, § 10-45.2; 1981, c. 219; 1984, c. 750; 1986, c. 567; 1988, c. 891; 1989, c. 656; 2020, c. 958.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958, substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” in the definition of “State-owned lands” in the last sentence.

§ 10.1-1122.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Management, harvesting, sale of timber on state-owned land.

The Department in cooperation with the Division of Engineering and Buildings shall develop a forest management plan for state-owned lands with the assistance of affected state agencies, departments and institutions.

Prior to the sale of timber from state-owned lands, the proposed sale shall be first approved by the Department and by the Division of Engineering and Buildings. The Department shall make or arrange for all sales so approved and shall deposit all proceeds to the credit of the Fund, except that when sales are made from timber on land held by special fund agencies or the Department of Military Affairs, or from timber on land that is gift property specified in subsection J of § 2.2-1156, the Department shall deposit in the Fund only so much of the proceeds as are needed to defray the cost of the sale and to implement the forestry management plan on that particular tract of land. The remainder of the proceeds from such a sale shall then be paid over to the special fund agency concerned, the Department of Military Affairs, or the agency or institution holding the gift properties, to be used for the purposes of that agency, department, or institution.

History.

1980, c. 525, § 10-45.3; 1981, c. 219; 1986, c. 567; 1988, c. 891; 2009, c. 612; 2019, cc. 659, 660.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 612 substituted “subsection H” for “subsection D” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 659 and 660 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “subsection J of § 2.2-1156” for “subsection H of § 2.2-1156”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 761, in subsection B, substituted “subsection I of § 2.2-1156” for “subsection J of § 2.2-1156”.

§ 10.1-1122.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Management, harvesting, sale of timber on state-owned land.

The Department in cooperation with the Division of Engineering and Buildings shall develop a forest management plan for state-owned lands with the assistance of affected state agencies, departments and institutions.

Prior to the sale of timber from state-owned lands, the proposed sale shall be first approved by the Department and by the Division of Engineering and Buildings. The Department shall make or arrange for all sales so approved and shall deposit all proceeds to the credit of the Fund, except that when sales are made from timber on land held by special fund agencies or the Department of Military Affairs, or from timber on land that is gift property specified in subsection i of § 2.2-1156, the Department shall deposit in the Fund only so much of the proceeds as are needed to defray the cost of the sale and to implement the forestry management plan on that particular tract of land. The remainder of the proceeds from such a sale shall then be paid over to the special fund agency concerned, the Department of Military Affairs, or the agency or institution holding the gift properties, to be used for the purposes of that agency, department, or institution.

History.

1980, c. 525, § 10-45.3; 1981, c. 219; 1986, c. 567; 1988, c. 891; 2009, c. 612; 2019, cc. 659, 660; 2022, c. 761.

§ 10.1-1123.
Use of Fund; management, receipt and expenditure of moneys.

The Fund shall be used to defray the costs of timber sales, to develop forest management plans for state-owned lands pursuant to §

10.1-1124

, and to implement those plans. The Department shall have the authority to manage, receive and expend moneys for and from the Fund for these purposes.

History.

1980, c. 525, § 10-45.4; 1981, c. 219; 1986, c. 567; 1988, c. 891.